Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.480

Delegation to ESD of state board of education program, project or service—Contract.

The state board of education may delegate to any educational service district or combination of educational service districts all or any portion of a program, project, or service authorized or directed by the legislature to be performed by the state board of education: PROVIDED, That any such delegation shall be by contract pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW, as now or hereafter amended.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.21.355.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.